Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,206
Transformational period, defined.

Transformational period means the period of time from the date of application through the end of the tenth year after the year in which the complete application was filed with the director.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 12.